Illinois, session 104th, HB5066.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Social 5Media Age Restriction Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Child" means an individual who is 16 years of age or 8younger.9    "Social media platform" means a public or semi-public 10Internet-based service or application that has users in this 11State and on which a substantial function of the service or 12application is to connect users in order to allow users to 13interact socially with each other within the service or 14application. For the purposes of this definition, a service or 15application that provides email or direct messaging shall not 16be considered to a "social media platform" on the basis of that 17function alone.18    "Operator" means any person or entity that owns, controls, 19or operates a social media platform and does business in this 20State. 21    Section 10. Prohibition on social media access by 22children.  HB5066- 2 -LRB104 17127 SPS 30546 b1    (a) An operator of a social media platform shall take 2reasonable steps, including the implementation of an age 3assurance system, to prevent a child from creating or 4maintaining an account on the social media platform.5    (b) An operator may enter into an agreement with 6application distribution services or device manufacturers to 7allow for user information to be shared for the age assurance 8purposes required under subsection (a).9    (c) The requirements of this Section do not apply to a 10parent or guardian who allows a child to use an account held by 11the parent or guardian. 12    Section 15. Cure period.13    (a) If the Attorney General determines that an operator is 14in violation of this Act, the Attorney General shall provide 15to the operator a written notice of the violation.16    (b) An operator shall have 30 days after receipt of the 17notice provided under subsection (a) to cure the violation.18    (c) No civil penalty shall be imposed for a violation that 19is cured within the 30-day cure period. 20    Section 20. Civil penalties. An operator that fails to 21cure a violation of this Act within the 30-day cure period is 22subject to a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 per child 23affected by the violation. Each day after the expiration of 24the cure period that the violation continues constitutes a   HB5066- 3 -LRB104 17127 SPS 30546 b1separate violation. The civil penalties imposed under this 2Section may be recovered in an action brought by the Attorney 3General. 4    Section 25. Compliance period. Notwithstanding any other 5provision of law, an operator shall have 180 days after the 6effective date of this Act to comply with the requirements of 7this Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.